Ohio, session 136, HB454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 121.17 be amended and section 4
121.171 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 121.17. (A) Under the direction of the governor, the 6
directors of departments shall devise a practical and working 7
basis for co-operation and co-ordination of work and for the 8
elimination of duplication and overlapping functions. They shall 9
co-operate with each other in the employment of services and the 10
use of quarters and equipment. The director of any department 11
may empower or require an employee of another department, 12
subject to the consent of the superior officer of the employee, 13
to perform any duty which he the director might require of his 14
the director's own subordinates. 15
(B) The directors of departments shall provide assistance 16
to the state government efficiency commission established under 17
section 121.171 of the Revised Code and shall cooperate and 18
coordinate to eliminate duplication and overlapping functions 19
identified by the commission. 20

H. B. No. 454 Page 2
As Introduced
Sec. 121.171. (A) The state government efficiency 21
commission is created to review state government services and to 22
eliminate duplication and overlapping functions among state 23
departments. 24
(B) The commission shall do all of the following: 25
(1) Identify instances of duplication, overlap, or 26
fragmentation across state departments and agencies; 27
(2) Recommend methods to eliminate or improve services; 28
(3) Estimate the potential cost savings of implementing a 29
recommendation; 30
(4) Prepare and deliver, in accordance with section 101.68 31
of the Revised Code, an annual report to the general assembly. 32
The report shall be submitted not later than the first day of 33
March, and shall summarize the work of the commission for the 34
preceding calendar year. The report shall include the findings 35
of the commission and shall offer recommendations. A 36
recommendation shall not be offered unless it has been approved 37
by a majority of the commission members. 38
(C) The commission shall consist of the following seven 39
members: 40
(1) Three members of the house of representatives 41
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; 42
(2) Three members of the senate appointed by the president 43
of the senate; 44
(3) The director of budget and management or an employee 45
of the office of budget and management designated by the 46
director. 47

H. B. No. 454 Page 3
As Introduced
(D) Members of the commission who are members of the 48
general assembly shall serve terms on the commission concurrent 49
with their term in the general assembly. 50
(E) A member of the commission may be removed at the will 51
of the member's appointing authority. Vacancies shall be filled 52
in the same manner as original appointments. 53
(F) The affirmative vote of not fewer than four members of 54
the commission is required for any action of the commission. 55
(G) Members of the commission are not entitled to 56
compensation, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary 57
expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties on 58
the commission. 59
Section 2. That existing section 121.17 of the Revised 60
Code is hereby repealed. 61